Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB365.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Joseph McGranaghan Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Joseph A. McGranaghan was born July 20, 1943.(2) Mr. McGranaghan is a 1961 graduate from William Penn High School in Harrisburg and attended Millersville State Teachers College.(3) As a public servant, Mr. McGranaghan served as an elected councilman in Chambersburg for four years and in Shamokin Dam Borough for 20 years, where he was appointed as Mayor in 2009, a position he held until his death.(4) Mr. McGranaghan was also the president of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 Susquehanna Industrial Development Corporation and the president of the Greater Susquehanna Valley Chamber of Commerce.(5) Mr. McGranaghan chaired the Susquehanna Valley Chamber's Transportation Committee and the Central Susquehanna Thruway Task Force where he worked to and successfully secured funding for the Routes 11 and 15 bypass project.(6) Mr. McGranaghan was awarded the 1992 Outstanding Leadership Award by the Central Susquehanna Valley Chamber of Commerce and the 2002 Star of Excellence Award by the Greater Susquehanna Valley Chamber of Commerce.(7) Mr. McGranaghan also had a career in broadcasting that began when he was a junior in high school.(8) In 1978, Mr. McGranaghan became the executive vice president of Sunbury Broadcasting Corporation and the general manager of its radio stations, WKOK-AM and WKOK-FM.(9) Mr. McGranaghan was appointed president and chief operating officer of the Sunbury Broadcasting Corporation in 1994, and in 2003, he became president of the Media Services Division.(10) Mr. McGranaghan served as chairman of the Radio Board of Directors and chairman of the Joint Radio/Television Board of Directors for the Pennsylvania Association of Broadcasters, where he was named the 1994 Pennsylvania Broadcaster of the Year.(11) After more than 30 years in broadcasting, Mr. McGranaghan retired in 2008, but continued to host the popular public affairs call-in show, "On the Mark" on WKOK.(12) In 2011, Mr. McGranaghan was inducted into the 20250SB0365PN0309 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Broadcasting Hall of Fame.(13) Mr. McGranaghan was known for his love of broadcasting, public service and his family and left an indelible mark on his community.(b) Designation.--The portion of U.S. Route 15 in Monroe Township and Shamokin Dam Borough, Snyder County, from its interchange with existing U.S. Routes 11/15 and U.S. Route 522 north of Selinsgrove to its interchange with existing U.S. Route 15 and Pennsylvania Route 147 south of Winfield is designated the Joseph McGranaghan Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0365PN0309 - 3 - 123456789101112131415